Washington statutes.
RCW 16.49.075

Unlawful acts—Selling, trading, or giving away uninspected meat or meat products—Interfering with director's duties.

It is unlawful for any person to:

(1) Sell, trade, or give away uninspected meat or meat products; or

(2) Interfere with the director in the performance of his or her duties under this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter.

[ 2000 c 99 s 8; 1987 c 77 s 9. Formerly RCW 16.49.700.]

NOTES:

Savings—1987 c 77: See note following RCW 16.49.015.